Utah statutes.
76-10-403.   Manufacture, possession, sale, use, or attempted use of a hoax weapon of mass destruction prohibited -- Penalty.

Any person who without lawful authority intentionally or knowingly manufactures, possesses, sells, delivers, displays, uses, attempts to use, solicits the use of, or conspires to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction with the intent to deceive or otherwise mislead another person into believing that the hoax weapon of mass destruction is a weapon of mass destruction is guilty of a second degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 166, 2002 General Session

